Utah statutes.
70A-2a-534.   Other remedies.

In addition to the rights and remedies provided for lease agreements and lease disputes in this chapter, a consumer, dealer, lessee, lessor, and manufacturer of assistive technology as defined in Section 70A-2-802 may exercise rights and seek remedies pursuant to any lease agreement under Title 70A, Chapter 2, Part 8, Assistive Technology Warranty Act, as limited by Subsections 70A-2-805(4) and 70A-2-807(4).

